Maryland, session 2026, SB0795.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Insurance
15–112.2.
[(h) (1) In this subsection, “covered services” means health care services that
are reimbursable under a policy or contract for vision services between an enrollee and a
carrier, subject to any contractual limitations on benefits, including deductibles,
copayments, or frequency limitations.
(2) A carrier may not include in a vision provider contract a provision that
requires a vision provider:
(i) to provide health care services that are not covered services at a
fee set by the carrier; or
(ii) to provide discounts on materials that are not covered benefits.
(3) (i) A carrier may not include in a vision provider contract a
provision that requires a vision provider, as a condition of participation in a fee–for–service
vision provider panel, to participate in a capitated vision provider panel.
(ii) Notwithstanding subparagraph (i) of this paragraph, a vision
provider contract may contain a provision that requires a vision provider, as a condition of
participating in a non–HMO vision provider panel or an HMO vision provider panel to
participate in a managed care organization.]
SUBTITLE 22. VISION BENEFITS, VISION BENEFIT PLANS, AND VISION BENEFIT
DISCOUNT PLANS.
15–2201.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “EYE CARE PROVIDER” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL LICENSED TO PRACTICE
OPTOMETRY UNDER TITLE 11 OF THE HEALTH OCCUPATIONS ARTICLE OR AN
INDIVIDUAL LICENSED TO PRACTICE MEDICINE UNDER TITLE 14 OF THE HEALTH
OCCUPATIONS ARTICLE.
(C) “VISION BENEFIT DISCOUNT PLAN” MEANS A POLICY, A CONTRACT, OR
AN AGREEMENT OFFERED BY AN INSURER OR A VISION BENEFIT MANAGER THAT
SOLELY PROVIDES FOR A DISCOUNT FOR VISION CARE SERVICES OR MATERIALS.

SENATE BILL 795 3
(D) (1) “VISION BENEFIT MANAGER” MEANS A PERSON THAT, TO THE
EXTENT THAT THE PERSON IS ACTING FOR AN INSURER OR A VISION BENEFIT
DISCOUNT PLAN, HAS:
(I) CONTROL OVER OR CUSTODY OF PREMIUMS,
CONTRIBUTIONS, OR ANY OTHER MONEY ON BEHALF OF AN INSURER OR A VISION
BENEFIT DISCOUNT PLAN OR WITH RESPECT TO A PLAN, FOR ANY PERIOD OF TIME;
OR
(II) DISCRETIONARY AUTHORITY OVER THE ADJUSTMENT,
PAYMENT, OR SETTLEMENT OF BENEFIT CLAIMS ON BEHALF OF AN INSURER OR A
VISION BENEFIT PLAN, OR OVER THE INVESTMENT OF THE ASSETS OF AN INSURER
OR A VISION BENEFIT PLAN.
(2) “VISION BENEFIT MANAGER” DOES NOT INCLUDE A PERSON THAT,
WITH RESPECT TO A PARTICULAR HEALTH BENEFIT PLAN, VISION BENEFIT PLAN,
OR VISION BENEFIT DISCOUNT PLAN:
(I) IS, OR IS AN EMPLOYEE, AN INSURANCE PRODUCER, OR A
MANAGING GENERAL AGENT OF, AN INSURER OR A VISION BENEFIT PLAN THAT
INSURES OR ADMINISTERS THE PLAN; OR
(II) IS AN INSURANCE PRODUCER THAT SOLICITS, PROCURES,
OR NEGOTIATES A PLAN FOR A PLAN SPONSOR AND HAS NO AUTHORITY OVER THE
ADJUSTMENT, PAYMENT, OR SETTLEMENT OF BENEFIT CLAIMS UNDER THE PLAN OR
OVER THE INVESTMENT OR HANDLING OF THE PLAN’S ASSETS.
(E) “VISION BENEFIT PLAN” MEANS A POLICY, A CONTRACT, OR AN
AGREEMENT OFFERED BY AN INSURER OR A VISION BENEFIT MANAGER TO AN
ENROLLEE TO PAY FOR, REIMBURSE, OR OFFSET HEALTH AND VISION CARE COSTS.
15–2202.
THIS SUBTITLE APPLIES ONLY TO AN INSURER OR VISION BENEFIT MANAGER
THAT ISSUES, SELLS, OR DELIVERS IN THE STATE A VISION BENEFIT PLAN OR VISION
BENEFIT DISCOUNT PLAN OR PROVIDES COVERAGE FOR VISION–RELATED SERVICES
UNDER A HEALTH BENEFIT PLAN.
15–2203.
(A) EACH INSURER AND VISION BENEFIT MANAGER SHALL PROVIDE A
DISCLOSURE ON ITS WEBSITE AND GENERATE A DOCUMENT CONTAINING THE

SENATE BILL 795
FOLLOWING INFORMATION:
(1) THE LEGAL NAME AND ENTITY TYPE OF THE INSURER OR VISION
BENEFIT MANAGER;
(2) THE LEGAL ADDRESS OF THE INSURER OR VISION BENEFIT
MANAGER;
(3) THE STATE IN WHICH THE INSURER OR VISION BENEFIT MANAGER
WAS FORMED OR ORGANIZED;
(4) THE PHYSICAL ADDRESS, MAILING ADDRESS, E–MAIL ADDRESS,
AND TELEPHONE NUMBER OF THE HEADQUARTERS OF THE INSURER OR VISION
BENEFIT MANAGER;
(5) (I) A LIST OF THE STATE AGENCIES WITH REGULATORY
AUTHORITY OVER THE INSURER OR VISION BENEFIT MANAGER; OR
(II) IF THERE IS NO STATE AGENCY WITH REGULATORY
AUTHORITY OVER THE INSURER OR VISION BENEFIT MANAGER, A STATEMENT THAT
NO REGULATORY AUTHORITY EXISTS OVER THE INSURER OR VISION BENEFIT
MANAGER;
(6) THE NAMES, PHYSICAL ADDRESSES, MAILING ADDRESSES, E–MAIL
ADDRESSES, AND TELEPHONE NUMBERS OF ALL PARENT COMPANIES, RELATED
HOLDING COMPANIES, AND WHOLLY OR PARTIALLY OWNED SUBSIDIARY
COMPANIES;
(7) A LIST OF ALL FEDERAL AND STATE LITIGATION TO WHICH THE
COMPANY HAS BEEN A PARTY IN THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING 5 YEARS; AND
(8) ALL FORMAL COMPLAINTS SUBMITTED TO THE ADMINISTRATION
AGAINST THE INSURER OR VISION BENEFIT MANAGER IN THE IMMEDIATELY
PRECEDING 5 YEARS BY A PURCHASER, AN ENROLLEE, OR AN EYE CARE PROVIDER.
(B) THE DISCLOSURE REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION
SHALL BE:
(1) WRITTEN IN PLAIN LANGUAGE;
(2) DISPLAYED IN AT LEAST 10 POINT FONT;
(3) PROMINENTLY DISPLAYED ON A PUBLICLY ACCESSIBLE SECTION

SENATE BILL 795 5
OF THE INSURER’S OR VISION BENEFIT MANAGER’S WEBSITE TITLED “REQUIRED
TRANSPARENCY INFORMATION FOR PATIENTS, DOCTORS, AND PURCHASERS”; AND
(4) CONTAINED IN A SEPARATE DOCUMENT ENTITLED “REQUIRED
TRANSPARENCY INFORMATION FOR PATIENTS, DOCTORS, AND PURCHASERS”
THAT IS INCLUDED WITH ALL DOCUMENTS AND DOCUMENT PACKAGES PROVIDED TO
CURRENT OR PROSPECTIVE ENROLLEES, PURCHASERS, OR PARTICIPATING EYE
CARE PROVIDERS, AND STATE AGENCIES WITH REGULATORY AUTHORITY OVER THE
INSURER OR VISION BENEFIT MANAGER.
15–2204.
(A) (1) EACH INSURER OR VISION BENEFIT MANAGER SHALL MAINTAIN A
TELEPHONE NUMBER TO RECEIVE QUESTIONS AND COMMUNICATIONS FROM
PARTICIPATING EYE CARE PROVIDERS.
(2) THE TELEPHONE NUMBER REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF
THIS SUBSECTION SHALL ALLOW PARTICIPATING EYE CARE PROVIDERS TO
COMMUNICATE WITH COMPANY REPRESENTATIVES DURING NORMAL BUSINESS
HOURS AND TO LEAVE VOICE MESSAGES AT ALL TIMES.
(B) (1) EACH INSURER OR VISION BENEFIT MANAGER SHALL MAINTAIN A
PHYSICAL MAILING ADDRESS AND AN E–MAIL ADDRESS TO RECEIVE
COMMUNICATIONS FROM PARTICIPATING EYE CARE PROVIDERS.
(2) AN INSURER OR A VISION BENEFIT MANAGER SHALL, ON THE
WEBSITE OF THE INSURER OR VISION BENEFIT MANAGER AND IN ANY PROVIDER
AGREEMENT, HANDBOOK, MANUAL, OR RELATED POLICY DOCUMENT:
(I) PROMINENTLY DISPLAY THE PHYSICAL MAILING ADDRESS
AND E–MAIL ADDRESS REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION; AND
(II) PROVIDE INSTRUCTIONS FOR THE SUBMISSION OF
QUESTIONS, DISPUTES, AND COMMUNICATIONS USING THE PHYSICAL MAILING
ADDRESS AND E–MAIL ADDRESS REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION.
(C) AN INSURER OR A VISION BENEFIT MANAGER SHALL:
(1) HAVE THE ABILITY TO HAVE A LIVE TELEPHONE DISCUSSION
WITHIN 24 HOURS AFTER AN INITIAL TELEPHONE CALL IS MADE TO OR A VOICE
MESSAGE IS LEFT WITH THE INSURER OR VISION BENEFIT MANAGER;

SENATE BILL 795
(2) ACKNOWLEDGE RECEIPT OF AN E–MAIL MESSAGE WITHIN 1 HOUR;
AND
(3) RESPOND TO SUBSTANTIVE QUESTIONS SUBMITTED VIA E–MAIL
WITHIN 72 HOURS.
(D) AN INSURER OR A VISION BENEFIT MANAGER SHALL, AT ALL TIMES,
MAKE AVAILABLE TO A PARTICIPATING EYE CARE PROVIDER THE MOST
UP–TO–DATE PROVIDER AGREEMENTS, FEE SCHEDULES, PROVIDER HANDBOOKS,
PROVIDER MANUALS, AND RELATED POLICY DOCUMENTS THROUGH THE WEBSITE
OF THE INSURER OR VISION BENEFIT MANAGER.
(E) ON REQUEST OF A STATE AGENCY WITH REGULATORY AUTHORITY OVER
THE INSURER OR VISION BENEFIT MANAGER, THE INSURER OR VISION BENEFIT
MANAGER SHALL SUBMIT ALL REQUESTED INFORMATION RELATING TO THE
HEALTH BENEFIT PLAN, VISION BENEFIT PLAN, OR VISION BENEFIT DISCOUNT
PLAN.
15–2205.
(A) AN AGREEMENT OR CONTRACT BETWEEN AN INSURER OR A VISION
BENEFIT MANAGER AND A PARTICIPATING EYE CARE PROVIDER:
(1) SHALL:
(I) 1. INCLUDE A FEE SCHEDULE THAT SPECIFIES, FOR
EACH COVERED SERVICE AND COVERED MATERIAL, THE CORRESPONDING
ALLOWED AMOUNT, AMOUNT OF REIMBURSEMENT TO BE PAID TO THE
PARTICIPATING EYE CARE PROVIDER, AND ANY FORM OF COST–SHARING AMOUNT
TO BE PAID BY THE ENROLLEE TO THE PARTICIPATING EYE CARE PROVIDER; AND
2. PROVIDE THAT THE AMOUNT OF TIME FOR AN
INSURER OR A VISION BENEFIT MANAGER TO RECOVER A REIMBURSEMENT AMOUNT
FROM A PARTICIPATING EYE CARE PROVIDER SHALL BE THE SAME TIME PERIOD
ALLOWED FOR AN INSURER OR A VISION BENEFIT MANAGER TO REMIT
REIMBURSEMENT TO A PARTICIPATING EYE CARE PROVIDER FOLLOWING THE
SUBMISSION OF A CLEAN CLAIM, UNLESS THE INSURER OR VISION BENEFIT
MANAGER IS CONDUCTING AN AUDIT OF ALL OF THE PARTICIPATING EYE CARE
PROVIDER’S CLAIMS BASED ON A REASONABLE BELIEF THAT THE PARTICIPATING
EYE CARE PROVIDER HAS ENGAGED IN FRAUD, WASTE, OR ABUSE; AND
(II) INCLUDE A COPY OF THE MOST RECENT PLAN PROVIDER
MANUAL AND ANY POLICIES REFERRED TO IN THE PROVIDER AGREEMENT

SENATE BILL 795 7
WHENEVER THE INSURER OR VISION BENEFIT MANAGER SENDS A PROVIDER
AGREEMENT TO A PROSPECTIVE OR PARTICIPATING EYE CARE PROVIDER; AND
(2) MAY NOT:
(I) REQUIRE A PARTICIPATING EYE CARE PROVIDER TO
PROVIDE SERVICES OR MATERIALS AT A FEE LIMITED OR SET BY THE INSURER OR
VISION BENEFIT MANAGER UNLESS THE SERVICES OR MATERIALS ARE DEFINED AND
REIMBURSED AS COVERED SERVICES OR COVERED MATERIALS UNDER THE
AGREEMENT OR CONTRACT;
(II) CONTAIN A FEE SCHEDULE, A REIMBURSEMENT AMOUNT,
OR ANY OTHER PROVISION THAT REQUIRES THE PARTICIPATING EYE CARE
PROVIDER TO PROVIDE COVERED SERVICES OR COVERED MATERIALS TO AN
ENROLLEE AT A FINANCIAL LOSS AFTER CONSIDERATION OF ALL APPLICABLE
DEDUCTIBLES, COPAYS, COINSURANCES, DISCOUNTS, REBATES, OR CHARGEBACKS;
OR
(III) RESTRICT OR LIMIT, DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY, THE
PARTICIPATING EYE CARE PROVIDER’S CHOICE OR USE OF SOURCES AND
SUPPLIERS OF COVERED OR UNCOVERED SERVICES OR MATERIALS PROVIDED BY
THE PARTICIPATING EYE CARE PROVIDER TO AN ENROLLEE.
(B) (1) AN INSURER OR A VISION BENEFIT MANAGER SHALL USE
STANDARDIZED CODES, NAMES, DESCRIPTIONS, AND DEFINITIONS PUBLISHED IN
THE HEALTHCARE COMMON PROCEDURE CODING SYSTEM TO:
(I) IDENTIFY AND DESCRIBE COVERED SERVICES AND
COVERED MATERIALS TO PURCHASERS, ENROLLEES, AND PARTICIPATING EYE CARE
PROVIDERS; AND
(II) CREATE AND OFFER A FEE SCHEDULE FOR COVERED
SERVICES AND COVERED MATERIALS IN AN AGREEMENT BETWEEN THE INSURER OR
VISION BENEFIT MANAGER AND THE PARTICIPATING EYE CARE PROVIDER.
(2) AN INSURER OR A VISION BENEFIT MANAGER MAY NOT ALTER OR
ATTEMPT TO ALTER THE MEANING OF ANY STANDARDIZED CODES, NAMES,
DESCRIPTIONS, AND DEFINITIONS PUBLISHED IN THE HEALTHCARE COMMON
PROCEDURE CODING SYSTEM.
(C) A FEE SCHEDULE DEVELOPED BY AN INSURER OR A VISION BENEFIT
MANAGER OR REIMBURSEMENT ISSUED TO A PARTICIPATING EYE CARE PROVIDER
BY AN INSURER OR A VISION BENEFIT MANAGER:

SENATE BILL 795
(1) SHALL PROVIDE FOR REIMBURSEMENT FOR ALL COVERED
SERVICES AND COVERED MATERIALS; AND
(2) MAY NOT BE NOMINAL OR DE MINIMIS.
(D) ALL AMOUNTS ALLOWED UNDER A FEE SCHEDULE AND
REIMBURSEMENTS PAID BY AN INSURER OR A VISION BENEFIT MANAGER SHALL BE
CLEARLY AND INDIVIDUALLY LISTED ON A FEE SCHEDULE MADE AVAILABLE TO THE
PARTICIPATING EYE CARE PROVIDER:
(1) AT THE TIME AN AGREEMENT IS OFFERED TO THE PARTICIPATING
EYE CARE PROVIDER BY THE INSURER OR VISION BENEFIT MANAGER;
(2) WITHIN 10 BUSINESS DAYS AFTER THE DATE AN APPLICATION IS
MADE TO BECOME A PARTICIPATING EYE CARE PROVIDER WITH THE INSURER OR
VISION BENEFIT MANAGER; AND
(3) AT ALL TIMES BY ELECTRONIC MEANS.
(E) AN INSURER OR A VISION BENEFIT MANAGER MAY NOT:
(1) ADVERTISE, CLAIM, OR REPRESENT TO PURCHASERS OR
ENROLLEES THAT SERVICES AND MATERIALS PROVIDED BY A PARTICIPATING EYE
CARE PROVIDER ARE COVERED, INCLUDED, OR COVERED WITH AN ADDITIONAL
DEDUCTIBLE, COPAY, OR COINSURANCE IF THE INSURER OR VISION BENEFIT
MANAGER DOES NOT REMIT AN ACTUAL PAYMENT AS FULL OR PARTIAL
REIMBURSEMENT TO THE PARTICIPATING EYE CARE PROVIDER;
(2) RESTRICT A PARTICIPATING EYE CARE PROVIDER FROM:
(I) ENGAGING IN DIRECT NEGOTIATION WITH THE INSURER OR
VISION BENEFIT MANAGER REGARDING REIMBURSEMENT FEE SCHEDULES, EVEN IF
THE PARTICIPATING EYE CARE PROVIDER IS AN INDIVIDUAL OR A MEMBER OF A
GROUP OF EYE CARE PROVIDERS PRACTICING UNDER A SINGLE EMPLOYER
IDENTIFICATION NUMBER OR TAX IDENTIFICATION NUMBER; OR
(II) AGREEING TO A DIFFERENT FEE SCHEDULE FROM THE FEE
SCHEDULE PROVIDED BY THE INSURER OR VISION BENEFIT MANAGER TO OTHER
PARTICIPATING EYE CARE PROVIDERS;
(3) DESIGNATE A SERVICE OR MATERIAL AS A COVERED SERVICE OR
COVERED MATERIAL IF THE REIMBURSEMENT AMOUNT TO THE PARTICIPATING EYE

SENATE BILL 795 9
CARE PROVIDER IS COMPOSED OF ONLY AN ENROLLEE’S PAYMENT TO THE
PARTICIPATING EYE CARE PROVIDER;
(4) CONDITION APPLICATION TO OR NETWORK PARTICIPATION IN A
HEALTH BENEFIT PLAN, VISION BENEFIT PLAN, OR VISION BENEFIT DISCOUNT PLAN
BY AN EYE CARE PROVIDER BASED ON THE EYE CARE PROVIDER’S USUAL AND
CUSTOMARY PRICING OR DISCOUNTS ON USUAL AND CUSTOMARY PRICING FOR
SERVICES OR MATERIALS THAT ARE NOT COVERED SERVICES OR MATERIALS;
(5) CONDITION A PROPOSED OR EFFECTIVE FEE SCHEDULE BASED ON
THE EYE CARE PROVIDER’S USUAL AND CUSTOMARY PRICING OR DISCOUNTS ON
USUAL AND CUSTOMARY PRICING FOR SERVICES OR MATERIALS THAT ARE NOT
COVERED SERVICES OR MATERIALS;
(6) REIMBURSE A PARTICIPATING EYE CARE PROVIDER A DIFFERENT
AMOUNT FOR COVERED SERVICES OR COVERED MATERIALS BECAUSE OF THE
PARTICIPATING EYE CARE PROVIDER’S CHOICE OF:
(I) OPTICAL LABORATORY;
(II) SOURCE OF SUPPLIER FOR CONTACT LENSES, OPHTHALMIC
LENSES, OPHTHALMIC GLASSES FRAMES, OR OTHER SERVICES OR MATERIALS;
(III) EQUIPMENT USED FOR PATIENT CARE;
(IV) RETAIL OPTICAL AFFILIATION;
(V) VISION SUPPORT ORGANIZATION;
(VI) GROUP PURCHASING ORGANIZATION;
(VII) DOCTOR ALLIANCE;
(VIII) PROFESSIONAL TRADE ASSOCIATION MEMBERSHIP;
(IX) ELECTRONIC HEALTH RECORD SOFTWARE, ELECTRONIC
MEDICAL RECORD SOFTWARE, OR PRACTICE MANAGEMENT SOFTWARE; OR
(X) THIRD–PARTY CLAIM FILING SERVICE, BILLING SERVICE,
OR ELECTRONIC DATA INTERCHANGE CLEARINGHOUSE COMPANY;
(7) REQUIRE A PARTICIPATING EYE CARE PROVIDER, A PURCHASER,
OR AN ENROLLEE OF A HEALTH PLAN, VISION BENEFIT PLAN, OR VISION BENEFIT

SENATE BILL 795
DISCOUNT PLAN TO OBTAIN PRIOR AUTHORIZATION, PREAUTHORIZATION,
PRECERTIFICATION, OR ANY SIMILAR MECHANISM THAT RESTRICTS THE ENROLLEE
FROM RECEIVING A COVERED SERVICE OR COVERED MATERIAL RECOMMENDED BY
THE PARTICIPATING EYE CARE PROVIDER AND REQUESTED BY THE ENROLLEE; OR
(8) IN THE COURSE OF ADJUDICATING A CLAIM FOR
REIMBURSEMENT, ALTER, DELETE, SUBSTITUTE, OR OTHERWISE CHANGE ANY CODE
OR MODIFIER SUBMITTED BY THE PARTICIPATING EYE CARE PROVIDER, INCLUDING
BY DOWNCODING, BUNDLING, OR REASSIGNING TO A DIFFERENT CODE, IF THE
CHANGE WOULD REDUCE PAYMENT OR OTHERWISE ADVERSELY AFFECT THE
PARTICIPATING EYE CARE PROVIDER OR ENROLLEE.
(F) (1) AN INSURER OR A VISION BENEFIT MANAGER SHALL REMIT TO
THE PARTICIPATING EYE CARE PROVIDER THE CONTRACTED REIMBURSEMENT
AMOUNT FROM THE FEE SCHEDULE FOR A COVERED SERVICE OR COVERED
MATERIAL PROVIDED TO AN ENROLLEE IF THE ENROLLEE IS VERIFIED TO BE
ELIGIBLE BY THE PARTICIPATING EYE CARE PROVIDER THROUGH CUSTOMARY
VERIFICATION METHODS OF THE INSURER OR VISION BENEFIT MANAGER TO
RECEIVE THE COVERED SERVICE OR COVERED MATERIAL ON THE DATE OF SERVICE.
(2) AN INSURER OR A VISION BENEFIT MANAGER MAY NOT
RETROACTIVELY REVERSE A REIMBURSEMENT OR WITHHOLD A FUTURE
REIMBURSEMENT TO A PARTICIPATING EYE CARE PROVIDER WHO RELIED IN GOOD
FAITH ON AN INDIVIDUAL’S PRESENTED COVERAGE CREDENTIALS AND THE
CUSTOMARY VERIFICATION METHODS OF THE INSURER OR VISION BENEFIT
MANAGER IF THE INSURER OR VISION BENEFIT MANAGER LATER DETERMINES THAT
THE ENROLLEE WAS INELIGIBLE TO RECEIVE THE COVERED SERVICES OR COVERED
MATERIALS ON THE DATE OF SERVICE.
(G) (1) A PARTICIPATING EYE CARE PROVIDER MAY OFFER AN ENROLLEE
THE OPPORTUNITY TO PAY THE PARTICIPATING EYE CARE PROVIDER DIRECTLY FOR
COVERED SERVICES OR COVERED MATERIALS IF THE DIRECT PAYMENT WOULD BE
LESS COSTLY TO THE ENROLLEE THAN THE TOTAL OUT–OF–POCKET COST
REQUIRED UNDER THE TERMS OF THE HEALTH BENEFIT PLAN OR VISION BENEFIT
PLAN.
(2) AN INSURER OR A VISION BENEFIT MANAGER MAY NOT SUBJECT A
PARTICIPATING EYE CARE PROVIDER TO AN AUDIT, REMOVE THE PARTICIPATING
EYE CARE PROVIDER FROM PARTICIPATION IN THE NETWORK, OR OTHERWISE
PENALIZE OR DISCRIMINATE AGAINST A PARTICIPATING EYE CARE PROVIDER FOR
OFFERING AN ENROLLEE THE OPPORTUNITY TO PAY THE PARTICIPATING EYE CARE
PROVIDER DIRECTLY UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION.

SENATE BILL 795 11
(H) AN AGREEMENT BETWEEN AN INSURER OR A VISION BENEFIT MANAGER
AND A PARTICIPATING EYE CARE PROVIDER MAY NOT REQUIRE THE PARTICIPATING
EYE CARE PROVIDER TO ACCEPT A REIMBURSEMENT PAYMENT IN THE FORM OF A
VIRTUAL CREDIT CARD OR A FORM OF PAYMENT IN WHICH A PROCESSING FEE,
ADMINISTRATIVE FEE, PERCENTAGE AMOUNT, OR DOLLAR AMOUNT IS ASSESSED TO
THE PROVIDER TO RECEIVE THE REIMBURSEMENT PAYMENT.
15–2206.
(A) THIS SECTION APPLIES TO AN AGREEMENT AN INSURER OR A VISION
BENEFIT MANAGER ENTERS INTO WITH ANOTHER ENTITY TO PROVIDE AN ENROLLEE
WITH COVERED SERVICES OR COVERED MATERIALS.
(B) AN AGREEMENT BETWEEN AN INSURER OR A VISION BENEFIT PLAN AND
A PARTICIPATING EYE CARE PROVIDER MAY NOT REQUIRE THE PARTICIPATING EYE
CARE PROVIDER TO PARTICIPATE IN, BE CREDENTIALED BY, OR ENTER INTO AN
AGREEMENT WITH:
(1) A SPECIFIC VISION BENEFIT PLAN OR VISION BENEFIT DISCOUNT
PLAN AS A CONDITION OF PARTICIPATION IN THE HEALTH BENEFIT PLAN PROVIDER
NETWORK OF THE INSURER OR VISION BENEFIT MANAGER; OR
(2) A SPECIFIC HEALTH BENEFIT PLAN AS A CONDITION OF
PARTICIPATION IN THE VISION BENEFIT PLAN OR VISION BENEFIT DISCOUNT PLAN
PROVIDER NETWORK OF THE INSURER OR VISION BENEFIT MANAGER.
(C) AN INSURER OR A VISION BENEFIT MANAGER ISSUING OR RENEWING A
HEALTH BENEFIT PLAN, VISION BENEFIT PLAN, OR VISION BENEFIT DISCOUNT PLAN
THAT PROVIDES BENEFITS FOR COVERED SERVICES OR COVERED MATERIALS
PROVIDED BY A PHYSICIAN OR THAT ARE WITHIN THE SCOPE OF PRACTICE OF AN
OPTOMETRIST LICENSED UNDER TITLE 11 OF THE HEALTH OCCUPATIONS ARTICLE
SHALL PROVIDE THE SAME REIMBURSEMENT FOR COVERED SERVICES AND
COVERED MATERIALS TO OPTOMETRISTS AT THE SAME RATE AS THE COVERED
SERVICES AND COVERED MATERIALS WHEN PROVIDED BY A PHYSICIAN.
(D) AN INSURER OR A VISION BENEFIT MANAGER SHALL APPLY THE SAME
TERMS AND CONDITIONS OF PARTICIPATION FOR ALL PARTICIPATING EYE CARE
PROVIDERS IRRESPECTIVE OF THE PARTICIPATING EYE CARE PROVIDER’S
EDUCATIONAL CREDENTIALS.
(E) AN INSURER OR A VISION BENEFIT MANAGER MAY NOT REQUIRE A
PARTICIPATING EYE CARE PROVIDER TO POSSESS, OFFER, OR SELL MATERIALS OR
COVERED MATERIALS IN ITS OFFICE AS A CONDITION OF PARTICIPATION IN THE

SENATE BILL 795
PROVIDER NETWORK OF THE HEALTH BENEFIT PLAN, VISION BENEFIT PLAN, OR
VISION BENEFIT DISCOUNT PLAN.
(F) (1) THIS SUBSECTION APPLIES TO ALL PLANS SOLD, ADMINISTERED,
OR OFFERED BY A HEALTH BENEFIT PLAN, VISION BENEFIT PLAN, OR VISION
BENEFIT DISCOUNT PLAN.
(2) AN INSURER OR A VISION BENEFIT MANAGER MAY NOT REQUIRE
A PARTICIPATING EYE CARE PROVIDER TO PARTICIPATE IN THE NETWORK OF ANY
OF THE INSURER’S OR VISION BENEFIT MANAGER’S OTHER HEALTH BENEFIT PLANS,
VISION BENEFIT PLANS, OR VISION BENEFIT DISCOUNT PLANS, AS A CONDITION OF
PARTICIPATION IN A NETWORK OF THE INSURER, VISION BENEFIT PLAN, OR VISION
BENEFIT DISCOUNT PLAN.
(3) AN INSURER OR A VISION BENEFIT MANAGER MAY NOT WITHHOLD
PARTICIPATION IN THE NETWORK OF ONE OR MORE OF THE INSURER’S OR VISION
BENEFIT MANAGER’S OTHER HEALTH BENEFIT PLANS, VISION BENEFIT PLANS, OR
VISION BENEFIT DISCOUNT PLANS FROM A PARTICIPATING EYE CARE PROVIDER
WHO:
(I) HAS COMPLETED THE CREDENTIALING REQUIREMENTS OF
THE INSURER OR VISION BENEFIT MANAGER; AND
(II) IS ALREADY PARTICIPATING IN ONE OR MORE OF THE
INSURER’S OR VISION BENEFIT MANAGER’S HEALTH BENEFIT PLANS, VISION
BENEFIT PLANS, OR VISION BENEFIT DISCOUNT PLANS.
15–2207.
(A) AN INSURER’S OR A VISION BENEFIT MANAGER’S APPLICATION FOR
INCLUSION AND CREDENTIALING AS A PARTICIPATING EYE CARE PROVIDER IN A
HEALTH BENEFIT PLAN, VISION BENEFIT PLAN, OR VISION BENEFIT DISCOUNT PLAN
MAY REQUIRE ONLY:
(1) THE STANDARDIZED INFORMATION SPECIFIED IN § 15–112.1 OF
THIS TITLE; OR
(2) INFORMATION SPECIFIED IN THE COUNCIL FOR AFFORDABLE
QUALITY HEALTHCARE CREDENTIALING APPLICATION.
(B) AN INSURER OR A VISION BENEFIT MANAGER SHALL IMPOSE THE SAME
APPLICATION AND CREDENTIALING REQUIREMENTS ON ALL PARTICIPATING EYE
CARE PROVIDERS IN THE HEALTH BENEFIT PLAN, VISION BENEFIT PLAN, OR VISION

SENATE BILL 795 13
BENEFIT DISCOUNT PLAN.
(C) AN INSURER OR A VISION BENEFIT PLAN SHALL PROVIDE A PROPOSED
PARTICIPATING PROVIDER AGREEMENT, INCLUDING APPLICABLE FEE SCHEDULES,
PROVIDER HANDBOOKS, AND PROVIDER MANUALS, TO AN EYE CARE PROVIDER
WITHIN 10 BUSINESS DAYS AFTER RECEIVING THE EYE CARE PROVIDER’S
APPLICATION FOR INCLUSION AND CREDENTIALING AS A PARTICIPATING PROVIDER
IN THE HEALTH BENEFIT PLAN, VISION BENEFIT PLAN, OR VISION BENEFIT
DISCOUNT PLAN.
(D) (1) AN INSURER OR A VISION BENEFIT MANAGER SHALL COMPLETE
THE CREDENTIALING DETERMINATION OF THE APPLICANT EYE CARE PROVIDER
AND NOTIFY THE APPLICANT EYE CARE PROVIDER OF THE APPROVAL OR DENIAL OF
AN EYE CARE PROVIDER’S APPLICATION FOR INCLUSION AND CREDENTIALING AS A
PARTICIPATING PROVIDER IN THE HEALTH BENEFIT PLAN, VISION BENEFIT PLAN,
OR VISION BENEFIT DISCOUNT PLAN WITHIN 30 BUSINESS DAYS AFTER RECEIVING
THE APPLICATION.
(2) A NOTIFICATION OF AN APPROVAL PROVIDED UNDER PARAGRAPH
(1) OF THIS SUBSECTION SHALL INCLUDE:
(I) A PROPOSED PROVIDER AGREEMENT FOR ACCEPTANCE
AND SIGNATURE OF THE EYE CARE PROVIDER; AND
(II) THE NAME, TELEPHONE NUMBER, AND E–MAIL ADDRESS OF
A REPRESENTATIVE OF THE INSURER OR VISION BENEFIT MANAGER TO PROVIDE
THE EYE CARE PROVIDER WITH THE OPPORTUNITY TO:
1. CONTACT THE REPRESENTATIVE TO DISCUSS THE
PROPOSED AGREEMENT BEFORE SIGNING; AND
2. ELECTRONICALLY SEND PROPOSED MODIFICATIONS
TO THE PROPOSED AGREEMENT TO THE REPRESENTATIVE.
(3) AN INSURER OR A VISION BENEFIT MANAGER SHALL RESPOND TO
A PROPOSED MODIFICATION SUBMITTED UNDER PARAGRAPH (2)(II)2 OF THIS
SUBSECTION WITHIN 5 BUSINESS DAYS AFTER RECEIPT.
(4) (I) AN INSURER OR A VISION BENEFIT MANAGER SHALL
PROVIDE AN APPROVED EYE CARE PROVIDER 90 BUSINESS DAYS TO EXECUTE THE
PARTICIPATING PROVIDER AGREEMENT DELIVERED UNDER PARAGRAPH (2)(I) OF
THIS SUBSECTION.

SENATE BILL 795
(II) IF AN APPROVED EYE CARE PROVIDER HAS NOT EXECUTED
THE PARTICIPATING PROVIDER AGREEMENT DELIVERED UNDER PARAGRAPH (2)(I)
OF THIS SUBSECTION WITHIN 90 BUSINESS DAYS AFTER RECEIPT, THE INSURER OR
VISION BENEFIT MANAGER MAY RETRACT THE PARTICIPATING PROVIDER
AGREEMENT.
(E) AN INSURER OR A VISION BENEFIT MANAGER SHALL ALLOW AN EYE
CARE PROVIDER TO BECOME A PARTICIPATING EYE CARE PROVIDER IN THE HEALTH
BENEFIT PLAN, VISION BENEFIT PLAN, OR VISION BENEFIT DISCOUNT PLAN IF:
(1) THE EYE CARE PROVIDER MEETS THE CREDENTIALING
REQUIREMENTS OF THE INSURER OR VISION BENEFIT MANAGER; AND
(2) THE EYE CARE PROVIDER SIGNS THE APPLICABLE PROVIDER
AGREEMENT.
(F) AN INSURER OR A VISION BENEFIT MANAGER MAY NOT EXCLUDE AN EYE
CARE PROVIDER FROM APPLYING TO BECOME OR FROM BECOMING A
PARTICIPATING PROVIDER IN THE NETWORK OF A HEALTH BENEFIT PLAN, VISION
BENEFIT PLAN, OR VISION BENEFIT DISCOUNT PLAN BASED ON:
(1) THE AGGREGATE NUMBER OF EYE CARE PROVIDERS IN THE
STATE, OR A COUNTY, CITY, ZIP CODE, OR OTHER GEOGRAPHICALLY DEFINED
SERVICE AREA;
(2) THE TIME, DISTANCE, OR APPOINTMENT AVAILABILITY FOR AN
ENROLLEE TO ACCESS A PARTICIPATING EYE CARE PROVIDER; OR
(3) THE EYE CARE PROVIDER’S PROFESSIONAL DESIGNATION,
INDEPENDENT PRACTICE AFFILIATION, OR PARTICIPATION IN OTHER HEALTH
BENEFIT PLANS, VISION BENEFIT PLANS, OR VISION BENEFIT DISCOUNT PLANS.
(G) WITHIN 20 DAYS AFTER THE EXECUTION OF A PARTICIPATING
PROVIDER AGREEMENT, AN INSURER OR A VISION BENEFIT MANAGER SHALL:
(1) INCLUDE THE PARTICIPATING EYE CARE PROVIDER AS A
PARTICIPATING PROVIDER IN THE HEALTH BENEFIT PLAN, VISION BENEFIT PLAN,
OR VISION BENEFIT DISCOUNT PLAN; AND
(2) LIST THE PARTICIPATING EYE CARE PROVIDER IN ALL PLAN
DIRECTORIES AVAILABLE TO ENROLLEES AND THE PUBLIC.
(H) (1) IF AN INSURER OR A VISION BENEFIT MANAGER DENIES AN EYE

SENATE BILL 795 15
CARE PROVIDER’S APPLICATION FOR INCLUSION AND CREDENTIALING AS A
PARTICIPATING PROVIDER IN A HEALTH BENEFIT PLAN, VISION BENEFIT PLAN, OR
VISION BENEFIT DISCOUNT PLAN, THE INSURER OR VISION BENEFIT MANAGER
SHALL DELIVER A DETAILED EXPLANATION FOR THE DENIAL TO THE APPLICANT
EYE CARE PROVIDER ELECTRONICALLY AND IN WRITING BY CERTIFIED MAIL.
(2) (I) AN INSURER OR A VISION BENEFIT MANAGER SHALL ALLOW
AN EYE CARE PROVIDER TO APPEAL A DENIAL OF AN APPLICATION FOR INCLUSION
AND CREDENTIALING AS A PARTICIPATING PROVIDER WITHIN A REASONABLE
PERIOD OF TIME.
(II) AN INSURER OR A VISION BENEFIT MANAGER SHALL
RENDER A DECISION ON AN APPEAL FILED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER THE INSURER’S OR VISION BENEFIT MANAGER’S
RECEIPT OF THE REQUEST FOR THE APPEAL.
(3) IF AN APPEAL FILED UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION
IS DENIED BY THE INSURER OR VISION BENEFIT MANAGER:
(I) THE INSURER OR VISION BENEFIT MANAGER SHALL
DELIVER A DETAILED EXPLANATION FOR THE DENIAL TO THE APPLICANT EYE CARE
PROVIDER ELECTRONICALLY AND IN WRITING BY CERTIFIED MAIL; AND
(II) THE EYE CARE PROVIDER MAY APPEAL THE DECISION TO
THE ADMINISTRATION.
(I) AN EYE CARE PROVIDER MAY NOT SUBMIT ANOTHER APPLICATION FOR
INCLUSION AND CREDENTIALING AS A PARTICIPATING PROVIDER WITHIN 180 DAYS
AFTER THE EYE CARE PROVIDER’S MOST RECENT APPLICATION FOR INCLUSION AND
CREDENTIALING AS A PARTICIPATING PROVIDER IN THE SAME HEALTH BENEFIT
PLAN, VISION BENEFIT PLAN, OR VISION BENEFIT DISCOUNT PLAN WAS:
(1) DENIED; OR
(2) APPROVED BUT A PARTICIPATING PROVIDER AGREEMENT WAS
NOT EXECUTED.
(J) AN INSURER OR A VISION BENEFIT MANAGER:
(1) SHALL MAINTAIN A PROVIDER AGREEMENT AS A DISTINCT AND
SEPARATE DOCUMENT FROM ANY CREDENTIALING MATERIALS; AND
(2) MAY NOT CONSTRUE RECREDENTIALING AS RECONTRACTING

SENATE BILL 795
WITH A PARTICIPATING EYE CARE PROVIDER.
15–2208.
(A) (1) AT LEAST 90 DAYS BEFORE THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF AN
ALTERATION TO A PROVIDER AGREEMENT OR A PROVIDER MANUAL INCORPORATED
BY REFERENCE INTO A PROVIDER AGREEMENT, AN INSURER OR A VISION BENEFIT
MANAGER SHALL:
(I) PROVIDE NOTICE TO THE PARTICIPATING EYE CARE
PROVIDER OF THE PROPOSED CHANGE; AND
(II) IF REQUESTED BY THE PARTICIPATING EYE CARE
PROVIDER, DISCUSS THE PROPOSED CHANGES IN A FACE–TO–FACE OR VIRTUAL
MEETING WITH THE PARTICIPATING EYE CARE PROVIDER.
(2) THE NOTICE REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL:
(I) CONTAIN A COVER LETTER ENUMERATING THE PROPOSED
CHANGES;
(II) CONTAIN A COPY OF THE AMENDED DOCUMENT WITH THE
CHANGES CLEARLY MARKED; AND
(III) BE STRUCTURED TO INCLUDE IMPLICATIONS OF THE
AGREEMENT OR NONAGREEMENT TO THE PROPOSED CHANGES BY THE
PARTICIPATING EYE CARE PROVIDER.
(3) IF A PARTICIPATING EYE CARE PROVIDER DOES NOT PROVIDE
WRITTEN APPROVAL OF PROPOSED CHANGES PROVIDED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF
THIS SUBSECTION WITHIN 90 DAYS AFTER THE PROPOSED EFFECTIVE DATE:
(I) THE EXISTING PROVIDER AGREEMENT SHALL REMAIN IN
FORCE BETWEEN THE PARTIES; AND
(II) THE INSURER OR VISION BENEFIT MANAGER MAY NOT
REMOVE THE PARTICIPATING EYE CARE PROVIDER FROM PARTICIPATION IN THE
HEALTH BENEFIT PLAN, VISION BENEFIT PLAN, OR VISION BENEFIT DISCOUNT PLAN
BASED ON THE PARTICIPATING EYE CARE PROVIDER’S FAILURE TO APPROVE THE
PROPOSED CHANGES.
(B) A PROVIDER AGREEMENT MAY NOT BE TERMINATED BY THE INSURER

SENATE BILL 795 17
OR VISION BENEFIT MANAGER UNLESS:
(1) THE PARTICIPATING EYE CARE PROVIDER HAS COMMITTED A
MATERIAL BREACH;
(2) THE INSURER OR VISION BENEFIT MANAGER PROVIDES THE
PARTICIPATING EYE CARE PROVIDER WITH WRITTEN NOTICE SPECIFYING THE
ALLEGED BREACH; AND
(3) THE PARTICIPATING EYE CARE PROVIDER FAILS TO REMEDY THE
ALLEGED BREACH TO THE REASONABLE SATISFACTION OF THE INSURER OR VISION
BENEFIT MANAGER WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER NOTIFICATION OF THE ALLEGED
BREACH.
(C) AN INSURER OR A VISION BENEFIT MANAGER MAY NOT REQUIRE A
PARTICIPATING EYE CARE PROVIDER TO ESTABLISH A SECURITY INTEREST IN ALL
OR PART OF ITS PROPERTY AND ASSETS IN A SUM EQUIVALENT TO FUNDS OWED TO
THE INSURER OR VISION BENEFIT MANAGER AT TERMINATION.
(D) A PROVIDER AGREEMENT BETWEEN AN INSURER OR A VISION BENEFIT
MANAGER AND A PARTICIPATING EYE CARE PROVIDER SHALL SPECIFY THAT EACH
PARTY SHALL BE RESPONSIBLE FOR ITS OWN ARBITRATION COSTS, CONTINGENT ON
A FEE–SHIFTING PROVISION THAT GRANTS PREVAILING PARTY STATUS.
(E) (1) AN INSURER OR A VISION BENEFIT MANAGER MAY NOT RETALIATE
AGAINST AN EYE CARE PROVIDER FOR:
(I) DISCUSSING, OR ATTEMPTING IN GOOD FAITH TO
NEGOTIATE, THE TERMS OF A PROVIDER AGREEMENT WITH THE INSURER OR VISION
BENEFIT MANAGER; OR
(II) FILING A COMPLAINT AGAINST THE INSURER OR VISION
BENEFIT MANAGER WITH ANY STATE AGENCY WITH REGULATORY AUTHORITY OVER
THE INSURER OR VISION BENEFIT MANAGER.
(2) THE COMMISSIONER MAY IMPOSE PENALTIES AGAINST AN
INSURER OR A VISION BENEFIT MANAGER FOR A VIOLATION OF THIS SUBSECTION.
15–2209.
(A) AN INSURER OR A VISION BENEFIT MANAGER MAY NOT:
(1) CONTROL OR ATTEMPT TO CONTROL THE PROFESSIONAL

SENATE BILL 795
JUDGMENT, MANNER OF PRACTICE, OR PRACTICE OF A PARTICIPATING EYE CARE
PROVIDER;
(2) EMPLOY A PARTICIPATING EYE CARE PROVIDER TO PROVIDE A
COVERED SERVICE OR COVERED MATERIAL;
(3) RESTRICT, LIMIT, OR INFLUENCE A PARTICIPATING EYE CARE
PROVIDER’S CHOICE OF ELECTRONIC HEALTH RECORD SOFTWARE, ELECTRONIC
MEDICAL RECORD SOFTWARE, PRACTICE MANAGEMENT SOFTWARE, OR
THIRD–PARTY CLAIM FILING SERVICE, BILLING SERVICE, OR ELECTRONIC DATA
INTERCHANGE CLEARINGHOUSE COMPANY;
(4) RESTRICT, LIMIT, OR INFLUENCE A PARTICIPATING EYE CARE
PROVIDER’S CHOICE OF SOURCES OR SUPPLIERS OF SERVICES OR MATERIALS,
INCLUDING OPTICAL LABORATORIES, USED BY THE PARTICIPATING EYE CARE
PROVIDER TO PROVIDE SERVICES OR MATERIALS TO THE ENROLLEE;
(5) RESTRICT OR LIMIT A PARTICIPATING EYE CARE PROVIDER’S
ACCESS TO AN ENROLLEE’S COMPLETE PLAN COVERAGE INFORMATION, INCLUDING
IN–NETWORK AND OUT–OF–NETWORK COVERAGE DETAILS;
(6) APPLY A CHARGEBACK TO AN ENROLLEE OR EYE CARE PROVIDER
FOR A COVERED PRODUCT OR SERVICE FOR WHICH THE INSURER OR VISION
BENEFIT MANAGER DOES NOT INCUR THE COST TO PRODUCE, DELIVER, OR PROVIDE
TO THE ENROLLEE OR PARTICIPATING EYE CARE PROVIDER;
(7) SOLICIT PATIENTS OR REFERRALS FOR SUPPLIES ON BEHALF OF
THE INSURER OR VISION BENEFIT PLAN OR ITS AFFILIATES BY IDENTIFYING
PARTICIPATING EYE CARE PROVIDERS IN AN INACCURATE OR MISLEADING MANNER
IN ANY LIST OF PARTICIPATING PROVIDERS OR ANY COMMUNICATIONS TO
PURCHASERS OR ENROLLEES;
(8) FALSELY REPRESENT THE NUMBER OF PARTICIPATING EYE CARE
PROVIDERS IN A REGION;
(9) FALSELY REPRESENT THE BENEFITS THAT CONSTITUTE A HEALTH
BENEFIT PLAN, VISION BENEFIT PLAN, OR VISION BENEFIT DISCOUNT PLAN TO
CLIENTS, GROUPS, PURCHASERS, COMPANIES, ENROLLEES, OR PROSPECTIVE
ENROLLEES;
(10) STATE IN ANY MARKETING OR ADVERTISING FOR A HEALTH
BENEFIT PLAN, VISION BENEFIT PLAN, OR VISION BENEFIT DISCOUNT PLAN THAT A
COVERED SERVICE OR COVERED MATERIAL IS “FREE”, “NO CHARGE”,

SENATE BILL 795 19
“COMPLIMENTARY”, OR ANY SIMILAR LANGUAGE TO INDUCE A CLIENT, A GROUP, AN
EMPLOYER, A PURCHASER, A COMPANY, AN ENROLLEE, OR A PROSPECTIVE
ENROLLEE TO PURCHASE SERVICES FROM THE INSURER, VISION BENEFIT
MANAGER, OR AFFILIATE OF THE INSURER OR VISION BENEFIT MANAGER;
(11) OFFER ENROLLEES OF A HEALTH BENEFIT PLAN, VISION BENEFIT
PLAN, OR VISION BENEFIT DISCOUNT PLAN VARYING DEDUCTIBLES, COPAYS,
COINSURANCE, COVERAGE AMOUNTS, REBATES, GIFT CARDS, OR OTHER
INCENTIVES TO OBTAIN SERVICES OR MATERIALS FROM:
(I) A PARTICULAR EYE CARE PROVIDER; OR
(II) A RETAIL ESTABLISHMENT OR INTERNET OR VIRTUAL
PROVIDER OR RETAILER OWNED BY, PARTIALLY OWNED BY, CONTRACTED WITH, OR
OTHERWISE AFFILIATED WITH THE INSURER OR VISION BENEFIT MANAGER; OR
(12) REQUIRE AN EYE CARE PROVIDER TO DISCLOSE OR REPORT:
(I) AN ENROLLEE’S CONFIDENTIAL OR PROTECTED HEALTH
INFORMATION UNLESS THE DISCLOSURE IS EXPRESSLY AUTHORIZED BY THE
ENROLLEE OR PERMITTED WITHOUT AUTHORIZATION UNDER THE HEALTH
INSURANCE PORTABILITY AND ACCOUNTABILITY ACT OF 1996;
(II) AN ENROLLEE’S MEDICAL HISTORY OR DIAGNOSIS AS A
CONDITION TO FILE A CLAIM, ADJUDICATE A CLAIM, OR RECEIVE REIMBURSEMENT
FOR A ROUTINE OR WELLNESS EYE EXAM; OR
(III) UNLESS THE INFORMATION IS NEEDED BY THE INSURER OR
VISION BENEFIT MANAGER TO AID IN THE MANUFACTURE OF A COVERED PRODUCT
OR COVERED MATERIAL SUBMITTED ON THE APPLICABLE CLAIM:
1. AN ENROLLEE’S GLASSES OR CONTACT LENS
PRESCRIPTION, OPHTHALMIC DEVICE MEASUREMENT, OR FACIAL PHOTOGRAPH; OR
2. ANY ENROLLEE INFORMATION OTHER THAN
INFORMATION IDENTIFIED IN THE CURRENT APPLICABLE VERSION OF THE HEALTH
INSURANCE CLAIM FORM APPROVED BY THE NATIONAL UNIFORM CLAIM
COMMITTEE AS A CONDITION TO ADJUDICATE A CLAIM, FILE A CLAIM, OR RECEIVE
REIMBURSEMENT.
(B) A COMMUNICATION FROM AN INSURER OR A VISION BENEFIT MANAGER
THAT DISTINGUISHES BETWEEN EYE CARE PROVIDERS OR THAT OTHERWISE CLAIMS
PROFESSIONAL SUPERIORITY OR THE PERFORMANCE OF A SERVICE IN A SUPERIOR

SENATE BILL 795
MANNER SHALL BE SUBJECT TO VERIFICATION BY THE ADMINISTRATION IF THE
COMMUNICATION REFERENCES:
(1) A DISCOUNT OR AN INCENTIVE OFFERED BY A PARTICIPATING EYE
CARE PROVIDER ON NONCOVERED SERVICES OR NONCOVERED MATERIALS;
(2) THE DOLLAR AMOUNT, VOLUME AMOUNT, OR PERCENTAGE USAGE
AMOUNT OF ANY MATERIAL, PRODUCT, OR GOOD PURCHASED BY A PARTICIPATING
EYE CARE PROVIDER; OR
(3) THE BRAND, SOURCE, MANUFACTURER, OR SUPPLIER OF A
COVERED SERVICE OR COVERED MATERIAL UTILIZED BY A PARTICIPATING EYE
CARE PROVIDER.
(C) THIS SECTION MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO LIMIT OR PROHIBIT
ADVERTISEMENTS THAT DO NOT OTHERWISE VIOLATE THIS SUBTITLE OR TITLE 13
OF THE COMMERCIAL LAW ARTICLE.
15–2210.
(A) AN INSURER OR A VISION BENEFIT MANAGER MAY NOT USE
EXTRAPOLATION TO COMPLETE AN AUDIT OF A PARTICIPATING EYE CARE
PROVIDER.
(B) ANY ADDITIONAL PAYMENT DUE TO A PARTICIPATING EYE CARE
PROVIDER OR ANY REFUND DUE TO AN INSURER OR A VISION BENEFIT MANAGER
SHALL BE BASED ON THE ACTUAL OVERPAYMENT OR UNDERPAYMENT AS
DETERMINED AFTER AN INVESTIGATION BY THE INSURER OR VISION BENEFIT
MANAGER.
(C) AN INVESTIGATION CONDUCTED UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS
SECTION MAY NOT CONCLUDE UNTIL THE PARTICIPATING EYE CARE PROVIDER WHO
IS SUBJECT TO THE INVESTIGATION HAS EXHAUSTED ALL OPPORTUNITIES TO
APPEAL THE INSURER’S OR VISION BENEFIT MANAGER’S FINDINGS UNDER THE
PROVIDER MANUAL OR POLICY DOCUMENT AND ANY APPLICABLE LAWS.
15–2211.
(A) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, AN EYE CARE PROVIDER
ADVERSELY AFFECTED BY A VIOLATION OF THIS SUBTITLE MAY BRING AN ACTION
FOR INJUNCTIVE RELIEF AND TO RECOVER MONETARY DAMAGES INCLUDING
DIRECT, INDIRECT, COMPENSATORY, AND PUNITIVE DAMAGES PLUS ATTORNEY’S
FEES AND COSTS.

SENATE BILL 795 21
(B) DAMAGES AWARDED IN AN ACTION BROUGHT UNDER SUBSECTION (A)
OF THIS SECTION MAY NOT EXCEED $10,000 PER VIOLATION.
15–2212.
(A) AN INSURER OR A VISION BENEFIT MANAGER MAY NOT REQUIRE A
PARTICIPATING EYE CARE PROVIDER TO OPT INTO OR OPT OUT OF THE PROVISIONS
OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(B) ANY SUBCONTRACT AGREEMENT BETWEEN A PARTICIPATING EYE CARE
PROVIDER AND ANOTHER PROVIDER TO PROVIDE LICENSED HEALTH CARE
SERVICES TO AN ENROLLEE OR COVERED DEPENDENT OF AN ENROLLEE OF A
HEALTH BENEFIT PLAN, VISION BENEFIT PLAN, OR VISION BENEFIT DISCOUNT PLAN
IN WHICH THE SUBCONTRACTED PROVIDER WILL SEEK REIMBURSEMENT FROM THE
PLAN OR THE ENROLLEE FOR THE SUBCONTRACTED SERVICES SHALL MEET THE
REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(C) ANY CONTRACTUAL LANGUAGE THAT VIOLATES THIS SUBTITLE SHALL
BE VOID AND UNENFORCEABLE AS A MATTER OF LAW.
15–2213.
THE COMMISSIONER SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO:
(1) PROVIDE A MECHANISM FOR AGGRIEVED INDIVIDUALS TO SUBMIT
COMPLAINTS TO THE COMMISSIONER FOR REVIEW, INVESTIGATION, AND
DISCIPLINE, AS APPROPRIATE; AND
(2) ENSURE THAT INSURERS AND VISION BENEFIT MANAGERS
COMPLY WITH THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SUBTITLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall apply to all
policies, contracts, and health benefit plans issued, delivered, or renewed in the State on or
after January 1, 2027.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
January 1, 2027.